District of Columbia statutes.
31-753

Merger of policyholder membership interests.

(a)

Upon approval of the Commissioner, a domestic or foreign reciprocal or mutual insurance company may merge its policyholders’ membership interests into a mutual insurance holding company formed pursuant to this section and continue, without interruption, the existence of the insurance company as a stock insurance company subsidiary of the mutual insurance holding company or as a stock insurance company subsidiary of an intermediate holding company which is a subsidiary of the mutual insurance holding company.

(b)

The Commissioner, after a public hearing as provided in § 31-703(g)(1), if satisfied that the interests of the policyholders are properly protected and that the merger is fair and equitable to the policyholders, shall approve the proposed merger and may require as a condition of approval such modifications of the proposed merger as the Commissioner finds necessary for the protection of the policyholders’ interests. The Commissioner may retain consultants as provided in § 31-703(g)(3). A merger pursuant to this section shall be subject to § 31-703(a), (b), and (c). The Commissioner shall retain jurisdiction over the mutual insurance holding company organized pursuant to this section to assure that policyholder interests are protected.

(c)

All of the initial shares of the capital stock of the reorganized insurance company shall be issued to the mutual insurance holding company. The membership interests of the policyholders of the reorganized insurance company shall become membership interests in the mutual insurance holding company.

(d)

Policyholders of the reorganized insurance company shall be members of the mutual insurance holding company in accordance with the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the mutual insurance holding company. The mutual insurance holding company shall at all times directly or indirectly own a majority of the voting shares of the capital stock of the reorganized insurance company. A merger of policyholders’ membership interests in a reciprocal or mutual insurance company into a mutual insurance holding company shall be deemed to be a merger of insurance companies pursuant to § 31-703 which shall be applicable.

History

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-112, § 4, 45 DCR 1792

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-3743.

Emergency Legislation

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-751.